Georgia statutes. TITLE 6 Aviation
Article 1 General Provisions

Cross references.

Establishment and operation of bank offices and facilities within primary airport terminal facilities at municipal or county airport, §

7-1-602

.

Airport firefighters, §

25-4-30

et seq.

6-3-1.
Construction and maintenance of air facilities by Department of Transportation.

The Department of Transportation is authorized and empowered to construct and maintain airports, landing fields, air navigation facilities, and lighting and lighting fixtures and to contract with the counties and municipalities of the state for the construction and maintenance of such airports, landing fields, air navigation facilities, and lighting and lighting fixtures, all in accordance with the Federal Aviation Administration’s specifications, regulations of the federal government, and upon such terms and conditions as the Department of Transportation may determine.

The State Transportation Board is given the right of eminent domain to acquire sites for such airports, landing fields, and air navigation facilities.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 237, § 2; Ga. L. 1965, p. 449, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 2004.

Cross references.

Department of Transportation aid for airport development, §

32-9-7

.

Licensing of airports by Department of Transportation, §

32-9-8

.